Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-441
Sections, when not applicable.

Nothing in sections 48-436 to 48-442 shall apply to any authorized or qualified person as defined in section 48-436 or the owner, agent, or employer of such persons in the performance of work or the moving of equipment in the conduct of its business.

Laws 1969, c. 390, § 6, p. 1373.